Utah statutes.
32B-4-602.   Unlawful transportation.

(1)  It is unlawful for a person, including a motor carrier, or staff of the person to order or purchase an alcoholic product or to cause an alcoholic product to be shipped, carried, or transported into this state, or from one place to another within this state except as otherwise authorized by this title.

(2)  This section does not prohibit a person, including a motor carrier, from:

(a)  transporting an alcoholic product in the course of export from the state; or

(b)  transporting an alcoholic product across any part of this state while in transit pursuant to a bona fide consignment of the alcoholic product to a person outside of this state.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

